Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.080

Claims—Duty to allow or reject—Notice of petition to allow—Attorneys' fees.

(1) The personal representative shall allow or reject all claims presented in the manner provided in RCW 11.40.070. The personal representative may allow or reject a claim in whole or in part.

(2) If the personal representative has not allowed or rejected a claim within the later of four months from the date of first publication of the notice to creditors or thirty days from presentation of the claim, the claimant may serve written notice on the personal representative that the claimant will petition the court to have the claim allowed. If the personal representative fails to notify the claimant of the allowance or rejection of the claim within twenty days after the personal representative's receipt of the claimant's notice, the claimant may petition the court for a hearing to determine whether the claim should be allowed or rejected, in whole or in part. If the court substantially allows the claim, the court may allow the petitioner reasonable attorneys' fees chargeable against the estate.

[ 1997 c 252 s 14; 1994 c 221 s 29; 1988 c 64 s 22; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.080. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 114; RRS s 1484; prior: Code 1881 s 1474; 1854 p 281 s 86.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.